Oklahoma, session 2026, SB627.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1000.31 of Title 59, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


The Oklahoma Uniform Building Code Commission is authorized to


establish standards for multiunit housing development building


codes. Such standards shall include the installation of storm


shelters designed for protection and safety from tornadoes or


tornadic winds in such multiunit housing developments, built on or


after the effective date of this act, that meet recommendations set


by the Federal Emergency Management Agency. Such shelters shall


include, but not be limited to, a safe room built as part of and



Req. No. 1387 Page 1


within real property, an in-ground shelter, or a prefabricated


shelter that is installed.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2357.417 of Title 68, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. For tax year 2026 and subsequent tax years, there shall be


allowed a credit against the tax imposed pursuant to Section 2355 of


Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes, for expenditures to purchase,


construct, and install a storm shelter designed for protection and


safety from tornadoes or tornadic winds including, but not limited


to, a safe room built as part of and within an improvement to real


property, an in-ground shelter, and a prefabricated shelter that is


installed.


B. The credit authorized pursuant to subsection A of this


section shall be in the following amount:


1. For expenditures to construct or install a storm shelter in


or at a single-family residence, twenty-five percent (25%) of


expenditures;


2. For expenditures to construct or install a storm shelter in


or at multi-family housing units that have already been constructed


and placed into service, twenty-five percent (25%) of expenditures;


and





Req. No. 1387 Page 2


3. For expenditures to construct or install a storm shelter in


or at multi-family housing units during the construction of the


units, twenty percent (20%) of expenditures.


C. For any taxpayer that is a business entity formed under the


laws of any state, including limited and general partnerships,


corporations, and limited liability companies, the credit claimed


pursuant to the provisions of this section shall not exceed Five


Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) in any tax year.


D. For any taxpayer that is a business entity formed under the


laws of any state, including limited and general partnerships,


corporations, and limited liability companies, the credit authorized


pursuant to the provisions of this section shall not be used to


reduce the income tax liability of the taxpayer to less than zero


(0). For individual taxpayers, if the credit allowed pursuant to


this section exceeds the tax imposed by Section 2355 of Title 68 of


the Oklahoma Statutes, the excess amount shall be refunded to the


taxpayer.


E. For any taxpayer that is a business entity formed under the


laws of any state, including limited and general partnerships,


corporations, and limited liability companies, if the amount of the


credit allowed pursuant to the provisions of this section exceeds


the income tax liability, the amount of credit not used in any tax


year may be carried forward, in order, to each of the five (5)


subsequent tax years.

Req. No. 1387 Page 3


F. The credit authorized pursuant to this section shall be made


on a form prescribed by the Oklahoma Tax Commission. The Commission


may promulgate rules to prescribe procedures for documenting


expenditures that qualify for the credit pursuant to the provisions


of this section.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1387 CN 1/19/2025 5:40:18 AM

































Req. No. 1387 Page 4